District of Columbia statutes.
9-1117.05

Withdrawal from Compact.

The Mayor of the District of Columbia, the Governor of the Commonwealth of Virginia, or the State of Maryland, may withdraw from this Compact at any time upon 30 days written notice to the other Parties.

History

March 31, 2000, D.C. Law 13-63, § 6, 46 DCR 9217

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90-day) authorization of the District to remove disabled vehicles from any portion of the Potomac River Bridges, see notes following § 9-1117.01.